Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8104.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 34-23-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 34-23 entitled "Mortgages
of Real Property" is hereby amended to read as follows:
34-23-5. Prepayment of mortgage loans.
(a) Every bank, trust company, loan company, building-loan association, credit union,
finance company and other person(s) making a loan or loans secured by a mortgage or mortgages
on real estate located in Rhode Island containing thereon dwelling houses of not more than four (4)
dwelling units shall provide in the mortgage note, and in any event the loan or loans shall be upon
the condition that the full payment of mortgage may be made at any time after one year from the
making of the loan without penalty, provided further, that during the first year, penalty or other
charges for prepayment shall not exceed two percent (2%) of the balance due at date of the pay-
off. If interest or other charges in connection with the loan or loans shall have been prepaid or
included in the face of the mortgage, the holder thereof shall rebate the interest or other charges
under regulations promulgated by the director of the department of business regulation.
(b) Alternatively a bank, trust company, loan company, building-loan association, credit
union, finance company and other person(s) making a nonpurchase money loan or loans secured
by a mortgage or mortgages on real estate located in Rhode Island containing on it dwelling houses
of not more than four (4) dwelling units, may impose a prepayment penalty or other similar charges
for the prepayment of a mortgage loan notwithstanding the prepayment penalty limitation imposed
in subsection (a), but only if:

(1) The terms, conditions and amount of the prepayment penalty or other similar charges
are prominently and conspicuously disclosed in writing to the borrower;
(2) The borrower agrees and consents to be bound by these terms and conditions; and
(3) Provided no prepayment penalty shall be imposed for any prepayment occurring more
than sixty (60) months after the date of such loan.
(c) Any bank, trust company, loan company, building-loan association, credit union,
finance company or other lender that chooses to offer a mortgage product pursuant to subsection
(b) shall have available a similar mortgage product that complies with the limitations set forth in
subsection (a) and all applicable federal regulations.
(d) Any prepayment penalty imposed under this section shall not be construed as interest
under the provisions of § 6-26-2.
(e) The limitations under this section shall only apply to mortgage loans made for real
estate containing owner-occupied dwelling houses of not more than four (4) dwelling units only if:
(1) The terms, conditions and amount of the prepayment penalty or other similar charges
are prominently and conspicuously disclosed in writing to the borrower;
(2) The borrower agrees and consents to be bound by these terms and conditions; and
(3) Provided no prepayment penalty shall be imposed for any prepayment occurring more
than sixty (60) months after the date of such loan.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005422/SUB A
========
LC005422/SUB A - Page 2 of 3